Utah statutes.
53-7-211.   Fire investigations by fire marshal.

(1)  If the division is of the opinion that further investigation of a fire is necessary, the state fire marshal, his deputy, or representative may:

(a)  join the investigation in cooperation with the fire officers who have been conducting it;

(b)  upon the request of the chief fire official of the political subdivision, assume control of the investigation and direct it; or

(c)  conduct an independent investigation if necessary.

(2)  A fire officer who has conducted or is conducting the investigation shall cooperate in every possible way with the state fire marshal, his deputy, and representative to further the purpose of the investigation.

(3)  The county attorney or district attorney of the county in which the fire occurred shall, upon the request of the state fire marshal, his deputy, or representative, assist in the investigation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

